Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,155
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-27,149 to 77-27,155 shall be known as the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax Refund Act.

Laws 1972, LB 716, § 7;

Laws 1974, LB 820, § 6.